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DTC P 1670/32 InjectionPumpSystemMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The correction system correct variations between each injection pump.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P1670/32 Openorshort in injectionpumpcorrectionunit circuit
S Injectionpumpcorrectionunit circuit
S Injectionpumpcorrectionunit

SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short in harness and connector between DATA of engine
ECU and DATA of injection pump correction unit (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between CLK of engine ECU
and VDD/CLK of injection pump correction unit (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check for open in harness in injection pump correction unit terminal GND and
body ground (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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4 Check waveform between terminal DATA of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect an oscilloscope between terminals DATA and E1

of the engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Within 0.5 seconds after the ignition switch is turned ON, check
the waveform between terminals DATA and E1 of the engine
ECU.
OK:

Thecorrectwaveformsareasshown.

OK Check and replace engine ECU

NG

5 Check waveform between terminal CLK of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) Connect an oscilloscope between terminals CLK and E1

of the engine ECU.
CHECK:
Within 0.5 seconds after the ignition switch is turned ON, check
the waveform between terminals CLK and E1 of the engine
ECU.
OK:

Thecorrectwaveformsareasshown.

OK Go to step 7.
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NG

6 Check waveform between terminal CLK of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the injection pump correction unit connector.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(d) Connect an oscilloscope between terminals CLK and E1

of the engine ECU.
CHECK:
Within 0.5 seconds after the ignition switch is turned ON, check
thewaveformbetween terminalsCLKandE1of theengine
ECU.
OK:

The correct waveforms are as shown.

NG Check and replace engine ECU.

OK

Checkandreplace injectionpump(SeePubNo.RM6 17E,pageFU −113).
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7 Check voltage between DATA of wire harness and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the injection pump correction unit connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal DATA of the injection
pump correction unit connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 4.5 to 5.5V

NG Check and replace engine ECU.

OK

Check and replace injection pump (See Pub No. RM617E, page FU−113).


